Connecticut, session 2026, HB05149.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General
Assembly convened:
Section 1. Section 10-233j of the general statutes is repealed and the
following is substituted in lieu thereof (Effective July 1, 2026):
(a) No student in a public school in the state shall possess or use a
[remotely activated] paging device unless such student obtains the
written permission of the school principal for such possession and use.
The principal shall grant such permission only if the student or [his] the
student's parent or guardian establishes to the satisfaction of the
principal that a reasonable basis exists for the possession and use of the
paging device.
[(b) A local or regional board of education may restrict the student
possession or use of cellular mobile telephones in the schools under its
jurisdiction. In determining whether to restrict such possession or use,
the local or regional board of education shall consider the special needs
of parents and students.]
(b) (1) As used in this subsection:
(A) "Mobile electronic device" means any hand-held or other portable
electronic equipment capable of providing data communication
LCO 1 of 4

Substitute Bill No. 5149
between two or more individuals, including, but not limited to, a
cellular mobile telephone, a text messaging device, a paging device, a
personal digital assistant, a laptop computer, equipment that is capable
of playing a video game or a digital video disk or equipment on which
digital images are taken or transmitted; and
(B) "Personal mobile electronic device" means a mobile electronic
device that is owned by or otherwise under the control of a student or
parent or guardian of a student and has not been issued to such student
or another student by the local or regional board of education.
(2) In accordance with the local policy adopted pursuant to
subdivision (3) of this subsection, no student enrolled in grades
kindergarten to twelve, inclusive, in a public school in the state shall
possess or use a personal mobile electronic device during the regular
school day, except a student shall be permitted to possess or use a
personal mobile electronic device if such possession or use is necessary
(A) to implement the provisions of an individualized education
program for such student or a plan pursuant to Section 504 of the
Rehabilitation Act of 1973, as amended from time to time, for such
student, or (B) for the health and well-being of such student as
determined by a licensed physician, physician assistant or advanced
practice registered nurse.
(3) Each local and regional board of education shall develop and
adopt a local policy restricting the student possession or use of personal
mobile electronic devices during the regular school day. A board shall
consider the unique needs of teachers, administrators, parents and
guardians and students in the school district. Such local policy shall
include, but need not be limited to, (A) a prohibition on such possession
or use by students on school grounds during the regular school day, (B)
provisions regarding the storage of personal mobile electronic devices
during the regular school day, (C) a system of discipline for violating
the provisions of such local policy, and (D) provisions permitting the
student possession or use of personal mobile electronic devices during
the regular school day (i) to implement the provisions of an
LCO 2 of 4

Substitute Bill No. 5149
individualized education program for such student or a plan pursuant
to Section 504 of the Rehabilitation Act of 1973, as amended from time
to time, for such student, or (ii) if a licensed physician, physician
assistant or advanced practice registered nurse has determined that
such possession or use is necessary for the health and well-being of such
student.
Sec. 2. (NEW) (Effective July 1, 2026) No local or regional board of
education may use social media as the exclusive means of directly
communicating with, or otherwise providing notice or information to,
students and the parents and guardians of students enrolled in a school
under the jurisdiction of the board. As used in this section, "social
media" has the same meaning as provided in section 10-231c of the
general statutes.
Sec. 3. Subdivision (8) of section 10-222aa of the general statutes is
repealed and the following is substituted in lieu thereof (Effective July 1,
2026):
(8) "Mobile electronic device" [means any hand-held or other portable
electronic equipment capable of providing data communication
between two or more individuals, including, but not limited to, a text
messaging device, a paging device, a personal digital assistant, a laptop
computer, equipment that is capable of playing a video game or a digital
video disk or equipment on which digital images are taken or
transmitted] has the same meaning as provided in section 10-233j, as
amended by this act.
This act shall take effect as follows and shall amend the following
sections:
Section 1 July 1, 2026 10-233j
Sec. 2 July 1, 2026 New section
Sec. 3 July 1, 2026 10-222aa(8)
LCO 3 of 4

Substitute Bill No. 5149
Statement of Legislative Commissioners:
In Section 1(a), opening and closing brackets were inserted around
"remotely activated" and "paging" was added before "device", for
consistency.
ED Joint Favorable Subst.
LCO 4 of 4